Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-812
Policies; maximum coverage; exceptions.

No certificate or policy of an assessment association, insuring property, shall cover a longer period than five years from its date, unless such assessment association shall provide in its bylaws for readjustment or reappraisement of such property insured at least once in five years.

Laws 1913, c. 154, § 134, p. 465;

R.S.1913, § 3271;

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. V, art. X, § 11, p. 646;

C.S.1922, § 7870;

C.S.1929, § 44-911;

R.S.1943, § 44-812.